Utah statutes.
53-2a-212.   Interstate agreements authorized -- Termination -- Mutual-aid compacts between subdivisions.

(1)  The governor is authorized to execute an interstate agreement or compact on behalf of this state with any other state or states only consistent with the powers herein granted concerning matters relating to a disaster affecting or likely to affect this state.

(2)  The agreement or compact shall continue in force and remain binding on each party state until the Legislature or the governor of a party state takes action to withdraw.  The action is not effective until 30 days after notice thereof has been sent by the governor of such party state desiring to withdraw to the governors of all other party states.

(3)  Political subdivisions are authorized to enter into mutual-aid compacts with other political subdivisions within the state of Utah concerning matters involving cooperative disaster response and recovery assistance support, consistent with this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

